Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5338.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-8.1. Certified school psychologist.
Effective September 1, 2027, each school system in the state shall employ a minimum of
one certified school psychologist, certified by the state department of elementary and secondary
education, for every five hundred (500) students enrolled in the school.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001193
========